Georgia statutes. 
(d) A person convicted in a municipal court of a first offense violation of Code Section 3-3-23 shall be punished as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 3-3-23.1, provided that nothing in this Code section or Code Section 3-3-23.1 shall be construed to give any municipal corporation the right to impose a fine or punishment in excess of the limits set forth in the charter of such municipal corporation.

(e) Nothing in this Code section shall affect the original and exclusive jurisdiction of the juvenile court as set forth in Code Section 15-11-10.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1462, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 20, § 22; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-46/HB 242; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, Code Section 36-32-9, as enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1462, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 36-32-10.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions."

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

36-32-10.1. Jurisdiction in counties without state court to try violations of Code Section 16-7-21; retention of fines and bond forfeitures; transfer of cases; penalties.

Statute text

(a) The municipal court of each municipal corporation in counties where there is no state court is granted jurisdiction to try and dispose of any violation of Code Section 16-7-21, relating to criminal trespass, if the offense occurred within the corporate limits of such municipal corporation. The jurisdiction of such municipal court shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of any other court within the county having jurisdiction to try and dispose of such cases.

(b) Any fines and bond forfeitures arising from the prosecution of any such case in the municipal court shall be retained by the municipal corporation and shall be paid into the treasury of such municipal corporation.

(c) Any defendant charged with a violation of Code Section 16-7-21 in a municipal court shall be entitled upon request to have the case against him or her transferred to the court having general misdemeanor jurisdiction in the county in which the alleged offense occurred.

(d) A person convicted of a violation of Code Section 16-7-21 shall be punished as provided in such Code section, provided that nothing in this Code section or in Code Section 16-7-21 shall be construed to give any municipal court the right to impose a fine or punishment by imprisonment in excess of the limits as set forth in the municipality's charter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-10.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1281, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

36-32-10.2. Trial upon citation, summons, or accusation.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any other contrary provision of law, in municipal courts which have jurisdiction over misdemeanor offenses or ordinance violations, such offenses or violations may be tried upon a uniform traffic citation, summons, citation, or an accusation.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-10.2, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 627, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Should Georgia Change Its Misdemeanor Arrest Laws to Authorize Issuing More Field Citations? Can Alternative Arrest Process Help Alleviate Georgia's Jail Overcrowding and Reduce the Time Arresting Officers Expend Processing Nontraffic Misdemeanor Offenses?," see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 313 (2005).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Beaman v. City of Peachtree City, 256 Ga. App. 62, 567 S.E.2d 715 (2002).

36-32-10.3. Jurisdiction over littering offenses.

Statute text

(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, in addition to any other jurisdiction vested in the municipal courts, such courts shall have the right and power to conduct trials, receive pleas of guilty, and impose sentence upon defendants for violating any provision of Part 2, Part 3, or Part 3A of Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 16 or Code Section 32-6-51 or 40-6-248.1 that is punishable for its violation as a misdemeanor. Such jurisdiction shall be concurrent with other courts having jurisdiction over such violations.

(b) A municipal court shall not have the power to dispose of misdemeanor cases as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section unless the defendant shall first waive in writing a trial by jury. If the defendant does not waive a trial by jury, the defendant shall notify the court and, if reasonable cause exists, the defendant shall be immediately bound over to a court in the county having jurisdiction to try the offense wherein a jury may be impaneled.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-10.3, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 3-11/HB 1320.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 1-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Comprehensive Litter Prevention and Abatement Act of 2006.'"

Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 5-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall become effective April 21, 2006, for purposes of adopting local ordinances to become effective on or after July 1, 2006.

36-32-11. Required training for judges.

Statute text

(a) All judges of the municipal courts, and all judges of courts exercising municipal court jurisdiction, shall periodically satisfactorily complete a training course as provided in Article 2 of this chapter.

(b) The Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council shall keep records of training completed by municipal judges and judges of courts exercising municipal court jurisdiction.

(c) If any municipal judge, or any judge of a court exercising municipal court jurisdiction, does not satisfactorily complete the required training in any year, the Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council shall promptly notify the Judicial Qualifications Commission, which may remove the judge from office unless the Judicial Qualifications Commission finds that the failure was caused by facts beyond the control of the judge.

(d) The reasonable costs and expenses of such training shall be paid by the governing authority of the jurisdiction where the judge presides.

(e) This Code section shall not apply to any magistrate judge, probate judge, or any judge of a court of record who presides in a court exercising municipal court jurisdiction.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-11, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1096, § 1/SB 351.)

36-32-12. Municipal court held outside municipality.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any other contrary provision of law, local or general, sessions of a municipal court may be held outside the municipality for which the municipal court is established if such sessions are held within a county in which the municipality is located or has its legal situs.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-12, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1025, § 1.)

36-32-13. Municipal court clerks; role of Municipal Courts Training Council.

Statute text

(a) For purposes of this Code section, the term:

(1) "Municipal court" shall have the same meaning as described in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-32-1.

(2) "Municipal court clerk" shall mean the primary person most directly responsible for the administration of a municipal court other than a judge of the municipal court.

(b) (1) Any person who is hired or appointed as a municipal court clerk on or after July 1, 2006, shall satisfactorily complete a minimum of 16 hours of training related to the operation of municipal court as prescribed by the Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council within his or her first year of service as a municipal court clerk.

(2) Each municipal court clerk, regardless of when he or she was hired or appointed, shall complete a minimum of eight hours of training related to the operation of municipal court as prescribed by the Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council on an annual basis. The training required by this paragraph shall be satisfied by completing the training provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection in the municipal court clerk's first year of service.

(3) The reasonable costs and expense of training required by this Code section shall be paid by the governing authority of the municipality from municipal funds.

(c) The Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council shall keep records of training completed by municipal court clerks.

(d) In any year that any municipal court clerk does not satisfactorily complete the required training, the Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council shall promptly notify the governing authority of the applicable municipality as well as the chief municipal court judge of the applicable municipality.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-13, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 658, § 1/HB 1288; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

——————————

ARTICLE 2

GEORGIA MUNICIPAL COURTS TRAINING COUNCIL

36-32-20. Short title.

Statute text

This article shall be known and may be cited as "The Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 2.)

36-32-21. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Certified municipal judge" means a municipal judge who has the appropriate required certificate of training issued by the council and on file with the council.

(2) "Council" means the Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council.

(3) "Municipal court" means and includes any municipal court as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-32-1.

(4) "Municipal judge" means a judge of a municipal court.

(5) "School" means any school, college, university, academy, or training program approved by the council and the Judicial Council of Georgia which offers basic, in-service, advanced, specialized, or continuing judicial training or a combination thereof, and includes within its meaning a combination of course curriculum, instructors, and facilities which meet the standards required by the council.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-21, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 326, § 1.)

36-32-22. Establishment of Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council; membership.

Statute text

(a) There is established a council which shall be known and designated as the "Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council" and which shall be composed of the director of the administrative office of the courts or the director's designee, which member shall not be a voting member, and five municipal judges who shall be appointed by the Council of Municipal Court Judges of Georgia. The initial terms for two members shall expire on December 31, 1991. The initial terms for three members shall expire on December 31, 1992. Following the expiration of these initial terms, their successors shall be appointed for terms of two years.

(b) In the event of death, resignation, disqualification, or removal for any reason of any member of the council, vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment and successors shall serve for the unexpired term.

(c) Membership on the council does not constitute public office and no member shall be disqualified from holding office by reason of his membership.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-22, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 184, § 1.)

36-32-23. Oath of office.

Statute text

Immediately and before entering upon the duties of office, the members of the Georgia Municipal Courts Training Council shall take the oath of office and shall file the same in the office of the Judicial Council of Georgia, which, upon receiving the oath of office, shall issue to each member a certificate of appointment.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-23, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

36-32-24. Election of chairman and vice-chairman; secretary; quorum; minutes; annual report.

Statute text

(a) A chairman and vice-chairman shall be elected at the first meeting of each calendar year.

(b) The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts or his designee shall serve as secretary to the council.

(c) A simple majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(d) The council shall maintain minutes of its meetings and such other records as it deems necessary.

(e) The council shall report at least annually to the Governor and to the General Assembly as to its activities.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-24, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 2.)

36-32-25. Remuneration.

Statute text

The members of the council shall receive no salary but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their functions; provided, however, that such expenses shall not exceed those allowed to members of the General Assembly.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-25, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 2.)

36-32-26. Functions, powers, and responsibilities.

Statute text

The council is vested with the following functions, powers, and responsibilities:

(1) To make all the necessary rules and regulations to carry out this article;

(2) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of every department, agency, or instrumentality of the state government or its political subdivisions in furtherance of the purposes of this article;

(3) To approve schools and to prescribe minimum qualifications for instructors at approved schools;

(4) To issue a certification to any municipal court judge satisfactorily complying with an approved training program established;

(5) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it wholly and adequately to perform its duties and to exercise the power granted to it; and

(6) To prescribe, by rules and regulations, the minimum requirements for curricula and standards composing the initial in-service, advanced, specialized, and continuing training courses for certification.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-26, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 2.)

36-32-27. Mandatory training of municipal judges.

Statute text

(a) Any person who becomes a municipal judge on or after January 1, 1991, shall satisfactorily complete 20 hours of training in the performance of his or her duties within one year after the date of his or her election or appointment in order to become certified under this article. Any person serving as a municipal judge prior to January 1, 1991, shall be exempt from completing these 20 hours of training.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, any person who becomes a judge of a court exercising municipal court jurisdiction on or after July 1, 2012, who is not subject to subsection (a) of this Code section, shall satisfactorily complete 20 hours of training in the performance of his or her duties within one year after the date of his or her election or appointment in order to become certified under this article. Any person serving as a judge of a court exercising municipal court jurisdiction prior to July 1, 2012, who is not subject to subsection (a) of this Code section, shall be exempt from completing these 20 hours of training.

(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, in order to maintain the status of a certified municipal judge or a certified judge of a court exercising municipal court jurisdiction, he or she shall complete 12 hours of additional training per annum during each calendar year after the year of his or her initial certification in which he or she serves as municipal judge or as judge of a court exercising municipal court jurisdiction.

(d) This Code section shall not apply to any magistrate judge, probate judge, or any judge of a court of record who presides in a court exercising municipal court jurisdiction.

(e) If a municipal court judge completes training hours in excess of the number of hours required by this Code section in a calendar year, credit for such excess hours, not to exceed six hours, shall, upon the request of the municipal court judge, be carried over and applied to the number of hours required for the next calendar year.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-27, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 882, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1096, § 2/SB 351; Ga. L. 2019, p. 722, § 1/HB 92.)

Annotations

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (e).

——————————

ARTICLE 3

COUNCIL OF MUNICIPAL COURT JUDGES

36-32-40. Creation of council; membership and organization; purpose; expenses; contracts; assistance to council; members not ineligible to hold office of judge.

Statute text

(a) There is created a council of municipal court judges to be known as the "Council of Municipal Court Judges of Georgia." The council shall be composed of the judges of the municipal courts of this state. The council is authorized to organize itself and to develop a constitution and bylaws. The officers of said council shall consist of a president, a first vice president, a second vice president, a secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as the council shall deem necessary. The council shall have an executive committee composed of two representatives from each judicial administrative district.

(b) It shall be the purpose of the council to effectuate the constitutional and statutory responsibilities conferred upon it by law, to further the improvement of the municipal courts and the administration of justice, to assist the judges of the municipal courts throughout the state in the execution of their duties, and to promote and assist in the training of such judges.

(c) Expenses of the administration of the council shall be paid from state funds appropriated for that purpose, from federal funds available to the council for that purpose, or from private funds available to the council, and from other appropriate sources.

(d) The council through its officers may contract with a person or firm including any member of the council for the production of educational material and compensate said member for producing such material, provided that funds are available to the council at the time of execution of the contract or will be available at the time of the completion of the contract and provided that the terms of the contract are disclosed to the full council and made available to the general public and news media. At the request of the council, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall be authorized to act as the agent of the council for the purpose of supervising and implementing the contract.

(e) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide technical services to the council and shall assist the council in complying with all its legal requirements.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a councilmember shall not be ineligible to hold the office of judge of a municipal court by virtue of his or her position as a member of the council and membership in the council shall not constitute the holding of a public office.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-40, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1923, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 36.)

36-32-41. Savings plans and deferred compensation plans for council members.

Statute text

(a) The Council of Municipal Court Judges of Georgia is authorized to create and oversee savings plans and deferred compensation plans for its members in good standing.

(b) Participation in such plans shall be optional for members of the council in good standing.

(c) Such plans shall be funded solely by the individual contributions of the members of the council who choose to participate in the plan.

(d) No money or other funds collected through a municipal court shall be used to fund such plans.

(e) The creation and oversight of such plans by the council shall not create a debt or other financial obligation for this state or any political subdivision of this state.

(f) The creation and oversight of such plans by the council shall not create any fiduciary liability on the part of the council.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-32-41, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 470, § 1/HB 370.)

Annotations

Effective date. - This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

——————————

CHAPTER 33

LIABILITY OF MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS FOR ACTS OR OMISSIONS

Sec.

36-33-1. Immunity from liability for damages; waiver of immunity by purchase of liability insurance; liability for acts or omissions generally.

36-33-2. Liability for failure to perform discretionary act.

36-33-3. Liability for torts of police or other officers.

36-33-4. Personal liability of councilmembers and other municipal officers.

36-33-5. Written demand prerequisite to action for injury to person or property; time for presenting claim and for consideration by governing authority; suspension of limitations; statement of specific amount of monetary damages sought; service of claim on city officials.

36-33-6. Exemption of municipal property from levy and sale.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Revisionist Municipal Liability," see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 375 (2018).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Governmental Entity's Liability for Failure to Prevent Crime, 30 POF2d 429.

Negligent Vehicular Police Chase, 41 POF2d 79.

Police Misconduct as Municipal Policy or Custom, 13 POF3d 1.

Qualified Immunity Defense in Civil Rights Actions against Law Enforcement Officers, 59 POF3d 291.

ALR. - Liability of governmental unit for intentional assault by employee other than police officer, 17 A.L.R.4th 881.

Liability of governmental unit for injuries caused by driver of third vehicle to person whose vehicle had been stopped by police car, 17 A.L.R.4th 897.

Governmental liability for compensation or damages to advertiser arising from obstruction of public view of sign or billboard on account of growth of vegetation in public way, 21 A.L.R.4th 1309.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance limiting the kinds or amount of actual damages recoverable in tort action against governmental unit, 43 A.L.R.4th 19.

Failure to restrain drunk driver as ground of liability of state or local government unit or officer, 48 A.L.R.4th 320.

Liability to one struck by golf ball, 53 A.L.R.4th 282.

Governmental tort liability as to highway median barriers, 58 A.L.R.4th 559.

Governmental tort liability for injury to roller skater allegedly caused by sidewalk or street defects, 58 A.L.R.4th 1197.

Liability of school authorities for hiring or retaining incompetent or otherwise unsuitable teacher, 60 A.L.R.4th 260.

Legal aspects of speed bumps, 60 A.L.R.4th 1249.

State and local government liability for injury or death of bicyclist due to defect or obstruction in public bicycle path, 68 A.L.R.4th 204.

36-33-1. Immunity from liability for damages; waiver of immunity by purchase of liability insurance; liability for acts or omissions generally.

Statute text

(a) Pursuant to Article IX, Section II, Paragraph IX of the Constitution of the State of Georgia, the General Assembly, except as provided in this Code section and in Chapter 92 of this title, declares it is the public policy of the State of Georgia that there is no waiver of the sovereign immunity of municipal corporations of the state and such municipal corporations shall be immune from liability for damages. A municipal corporation shall not waive its immunity by the purchase of liability insurance, except as provided in Code Section 33-24-51 or 36-92-2, or unless the policy of insurance issued covers an occurrence for which the defense of sovereign immunity is available, and then only to the extent of the limits of such insurance policy. This subsection shall not be construed to affect any litigation pending on July 1, 1986.

(b) Municipal corporations shall not be liable for failure to perform or for errors in performing their legislative or judicial powers. For neglect to perform or improper or unskillful performance of their ministerial duties, they shall be liable.

History

(Civil Code 1895, § 748; Civil Code 1910, § 897; Code 1933, § 69-301; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1312, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 2002, p. 579, § 2.)

Annotations

History of section. - This Code section is derived from the decisions in Rivers v. City Council, 65 Ga. 376 (1880) and Collins v. Mayor of Macon, 69 Ga. 542 (1882).

Cross references. - Liability of municipalities for defects in public roads, § 32-4-93.

Limited waiver of governmental immunity by purchase of motor vehicle liability insurance, § 33-24-51.

Law reviews. - For article, "The Tort Liability of Municipalities in Georgia," see 17 Ga. B. J. 456 (1955). For article, "Actions for Wrongful Death in Georgia: Parts Three and Four," see 21 Ga. B. J. 339 (1959). For article surveying tort liability insurance in Georgia local government law, see 24 Mercer L. Rev. 651 (1973). For article, "Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975). For article discussing Georgia's practice of exposing municipalities to tort liability through the use of nuisance law, see 12 Ga. St. B. J. 11 (1975). For article discussing municipal tort liability and the defense of extraterritorial operation, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (1977). For article discussing sovereign immunity and the State Court of Claims, see 14 Ga. St. B. J. 152 (1978). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For article discussing origin and construction of municipal tort liability law in Georgia, see 14 Ga. L. Rev. 239 (1980). For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986). For article, "Georgia Local Government Tort Liability: The 'Crisis' Conundrum," see 2 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 19 (1986). For article, "'Sue and Be Sued' in Georgia Local Government Law: A Vignette of Vicissitudes," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 13 (1989). For annual survey on law of torts, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 395 (1991). For article, "Local Government Tort Liability: The Summer of '92," see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 405 (1993). For article, "Georgia's Public Duty Doctrine: The Supreme Court Held Hostage," see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (1999). For annual survey of administrative law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2004). For annual survey of construction law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2004). For article, "Police Pursuits: A Comprehensive Look at the Broad Spectrum of Police Pursuit Liability and Law," see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 511 (2006). For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007). For survey article on local government law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008). For annual survey of administrative law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2015). For survey article on local government law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (2015). For annual survey on local government law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 189 (2019).

For note discussing governmental immunity from tort liability in Georgia, see 5 Ga. St. B. J. 494 (1969). For note, "Adverse Possession of Municipal and County Property Held for Proprietary Purposes: The Unique Georgia Development," see 7 Ga. St. B. J. 482 (1971). For note analyzing sovereign immunity in this state and proposing implementation of a waiver scheme and creation of a court of claims, see 27 Emory L.J. 717 (1978). For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 243 (2002).

For comment on City of Atlanta v. Hurley, 83 Ga. App. 879, 65 S.E.2d 44 (1951), see 3 Mercer L. Rev. 218 (1951). For comment criticizing City of Atlanta v. Hurley, see 14 Ga. B. J. 80 (1951). For comment on Caroway v. City of Atlanta, 85 Ga. App. 792, 70 S.E.2d 126 (1952), see 15 Ga. B. J. 79 (1952). For comment on Knowles v. Housing Auth., 212 Ga. 729, 95 S.E.2d 659 (1957), holding that the Act giving the housing authority unqualified power to sue and be sued under § 49-2-6 waived any immunity the authority otherwise might have claimed under the state's privilege of governmental immunity, see 20 Ga. B. J. 258 (1957). For comment on Ethridge v. Lavonia, 101 Ga. App. 190, 112 S.E.2d 822 (1960), see 23 Ga. B. J. 129 (1960). For comment on City of Atlanta v. Mapel, 121 Ga. App. 567, 174 S.E.2d 599 (1970), as to municipal corporation's negligence liability for injuries sustained at municipal golf courses, see 22 Mercer L. Rev. 608 (1971).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Nonliability for Governmental Functions

Liability for Ministerial Functions

Nuisances

Officers and Employees

Parks and Recreation

Roads and Bridges

Sewers

Transportation

Other Duties

General Consideration

Legislature has unfortunately codified the doctrine of municipal immunity into statutory law to the extent that the judicial branch of government has been preempted from effectively destroying that which the judiciary created. City of Atlanta v. Mapel, 121 Ga. App. 567, 174 S.E.2d 599 (1970).

Violation of duty to act. - When the city knows or ought to know of a defect, in time to repair or give warning of the defect, the city is liable for injuries sustained because of the defect regardless of the defect's cause. City of Rome v. Brinkley, 54 Ga. App. 391, 187 S.E. 911 (1936).

If a municipality did not perform an act creating a dangerous condition, the failure of the municipality to rectify the dangerous condition must be in violation of a duty to act. Mayor of Savannah v. Palmerio, 242 Ga. 419, 249 S.E.2d 224 (1978).

In action to recover overcharges for electricity, defendant-municipality has legal duty to disclose existence of more favorable demand meter rate. City of Commerce v. Duncan & Godfrey, Inc., 157 Ga. App. 337, 277 S.E.2d 266 (1981).

No distinction between negligent and intentional torts. - Former Code 1933, §§ 69-301 and 69-307 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-33-1 and 36-33-3) did not distinguish between torts of nonfeasance or misfeasance committed by negligence, and other torts committed corruptly, maliciously, willfully, or wantonly. Brown v. City of Union Point, 52 Ga. App. 212, 183 S.E. 78 (1935).

Applicability to federal actions. - State cannot impose conditions precedent to the right of a party to proceed under 42 U.S.C. § 1983. Williams v. Posey, 475 F. Supp. 133 (M.D. Ga. 1979).

Applicability to diversity actions. - In a diversity action against a Georgia city arising out of an accident in South Carolina involving a city garbage truck, even though the city would not be entitled to sovereign immunity under South Carolina law, immunity enjoyed by the city under Georgia law would be extended as a matter of comity. Davis v. City of Augusta, 942 F. Supp. 577 (S.D. Ga. 1996).

Inapplicable when waiver of immunity undisputed. - O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1 does not create a duty on the part of cities to perform all acts properly and skillfully; the statute simply creates an exception from sovereign immunity for cities' negligence in proprietary or nongovernmental matters and did not apply in a case where defendants' waiver of sovereign immunity was undisputed. City of Buford v. Ward, 212 Ga. App. 752, 443 S.E.2d 279 (1994).

Effect of demand statute. - Before the enactment of former Code 1933, § 69-308 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5), requiring a demand, the liability of every municipal corporation in Georgia, under former Code 1933, § 69-301 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1), was unqualified and unconditional; by the enactment of the law requiring a demand this unqualified liability of each municipal corporation became conditional upon the demand required by the statute. City of Atlanta v. Hudgins, 193 Ga. 618, 19 S.E.2d 508 (1942).

Notice requirement. - Notice must be given to hold liable a municipality for negligent ministerial acts. Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971).

Establishment of waiver. - Sovereign immunity is not an affirmative defense that must be established by the party seeking its protection; waiver of immunity must be established by the party seeking to benefit from the waiver. City of Lawrenceville v. Macko, 211 Ga. App. 312, 439 S.E.2d 95 (1993), overruled on other grounds by Clive v. Gregory, 280 Ga. App. 836, 635 S.E.2d 188, 2006 Ga. App. LEXIS 880 (Ga. Ct. App. 2006).

Sovereign immunity waived only by legislative act. - Relying on the plain language of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a), the Georgia Supreme Court concluded that sovereign immunity could be waived only by an act of the legislature and, therefore, the indemnification agreement between the city and a corporation was void as an ultra vires contract; however, the case was remanded to the federal district court for consideration of whether, pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a), the city waived the city's sovereign immunity as to the corporation's cause of action by purchasing insurance. CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 355 F.3d 1295 (11th Cir. 2004).

Purchase of liability insurance no waiver of immunity. - Absent statutory authority limiting the application of the provisions of this chapter, the procurement of liability insurance by the city does not constitute a waiver of the defense of sovereign immunity insofar as this defense bars recovery for damages caused by the performance of a governmental function in a negligent manner. Winston v. City of Austell, 123 Ga. App. 183, 179 S.E.2d 665 (1971).

Evidence did not show that the city waived the city's governmental immunity by purchasing liability insurance; thus, the city had governmental immunity on the individual's claims against the city arising out of the police officer's arrest of the individual for criminal trespass. Reese v. City of Atlanta, 261 Ga. App. 761, 583 S.E.2d 584 (2003).

Waiver by purchase of liability insurance. - Even if spraying for mosquito eradication is a governmental function, if as provided for in Ga. L. 1960, p. 289, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51), the city secures insurance to cover liability for damages arising by reason of ownership, maintenance, operation, or use of any motor vehicle by the municipal corporation, under the municipality's management, control or supervision, whether in a governmental undertaking or not, the municipality's governmental immunity shall be waived to the extent of the amount of insurance so purchased. Mitchell v. City of St. Marys, 155 Ga. App. 642, 271 S.E.2d 895 (1980).

In a tort action for personal injuries and property damage arising from an auto collision filed against a city and the city's police officer, the trial court erred in granting a city summary judgment as: (1) O.C.G.A. § 40-6-6(d)(2) did not apply; and (2) the city waived the city's sovereign immunity to the extent that the city purchased liability coverage to cover the officer's actions in operating that officer's police car. But, the trial court properly granted summary judgment to the officer, given that the officer was engaged in a discretionary function of responding to an emergency situation at the time the accident at issue occurred. Weaver v. City of Statesboro, 288 Ga. App. 32, 653 S.E.2d 765 (2007), cert. denied, No. S08C0421, 2008 Ga. LEXIS 221 (Ga. 2008).

In a negligence action against a city by plaintiffs injured in a collision with an on-duty police officer, the city's purchase of a general liability insurance policy covering claims in excess of $250,000 waived the city's sovereign immunity to the limits of the policy; since the city did not have a self-insurance plan, participate in any sort of insurance fund or pool, or set aside funds for the payment of liability claims, plaintiffs could recover only damages exceeding the $250,000 threshold. McLemore v. City Council, 212 Ga. 862, 443 S.E.2d 505 (1994).

City was not entitled to sovereign immunity because the city's "Public Officials Errors and Omissions" insurance policy covered the wrongful termination claims brought by city employees; therefore, consistent with O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a), the city was deemed to have waived sovereign immunity to the extent of the limits of the city's insurance policy covering those claims. Owens v. City of Greenville, 290 Ga. 557, 722 S.E.2d 755 (2012).

Although a fact issue existed as to whether a city had waived the city's sovereign immunity by purchasing insurance that covered an arrestee's claims arising from an arrest for burglary, the claims for slander, fraud, false imprisonment, and racketeering failed because there was probable cause to make the arrest. Gray v. Ector, 541 Fed. Appx. 920 (11th Cir. 2013)(Unpublished).

Insufficient proof of liability insurance. - Because there was no evidence of record that a city maintained liability insurance that would cover the occurrences forming the basis of the developers' claims, there was no waiver of the city's sovereign immunity pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a); thus, sovereign immunity was a viable defense as to the city and the city officials acting in their official capacities. Wendelken v. JENK LLC, 291 Ga. App. 30, 661 S.E.2d 152 (2008).

Charter provision constitutional. - A 1983 amendment to the charter of the consolidated local government of Columbus which provided that the tort liability of the consolidated government would be the tort liability applicable to counties was valid and constitutional. Bowen v. City of Columbus, 256 Ga. 462, 349 S.E.2d 740 (1986).

Waiver by municipality. - According to the Georgia Supreme Court, Georgia municipalities may never waive a municipality's sovereign immunity by, for example, contracting to indemnify third parties without either express legislative authority or satisfying the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a). CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 355 F.3d 1295 (11th Cir. 2004).

Unified city/county government was not a municipality for purposes of the waiver of sovereign immunity by operation of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1 because the charter creating the unified government expressly provided that the government's tort and nuisance liability would follow the law and rules of tort liability applicable to counties in Georgia. Athens-Clarke County v. Torres, 246 Ga. App. 215, 540 S.E.2d 225 (2000).

No immunity for breach of contract. - Municipal immunity is not a valid defense to an action for breach of contract. Precise v. City of Rossville, 261 Ga. 210, 403 S.E.2d 47 (1991).
